Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-2701 to 71-2705 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Crisis Protocol Act.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 5.

COVID-19 Liability Act, see section 25-3601.